Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Chapter 1 State Officers

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d Public Officers and Employees § 1 et seq.; 72 Am. Jur. 2d States, Territories and Dependencies § 62.

Limitation, under 18 USC § 207, on participation of former federal government officers and employees in proceedings involving federal government, 71 ALR Fed 360.

Validity, under federal constitution, of regulations, rules or statutes requiring random or mass drug testing of public employees or persons whose employment is regulated by state, local or federal government, 86 ALR Fed 420.

81A C.J.S. States §§ 38, 83, 85.